Hawaii statutes.
§342L-10 Penalties. (a) Any person
who violates this chapter, any rule adopted pursuant to this chapter, or any
condition of a permit or variance issued pursuant to this chapter shall be
fined not more than $25,000 for each individual tank for each day of each
violation. Each day of each violation shall constitute a separate offense. In
addition, any person who fails to comply with an order issued under this
chapter within the time specified in the order shall be fined not more than
$25,000 for each day of noncompliance with the order. Any action taken in
environmental court to impose or collect the penalty provided for in this
subsection shall be considered a civil action.

(b) Any person who:

(1) Denies, obstructs, or hampers the entrance,
inspection, or conduct of release response activities by any duly authorized
representative of the department at any building, place, site, facility,
vehicle, or structure that the representative is authorized to enter, inspect,
or at which the representative is authorized to conduct release response
activities; or

(2) Fails to provide information requested by the
representative as required under section 342L-7;

shall be fined not more than $500 per day of denial,
obstruction, hindrance, or failure. Any action taken in environmental court to
impose or collect the penalty provided for in this subsection shall be
considered a civil action. [L 1989, c 212, pt of §6; am L 1991, c 157, §17; am
L 1992, c 259, §12; am L 1995, c 180, §31; am L 2014, c 218, §8]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next